Washington statutes.
RCW 15.83.080

Unlawful practices—Civil penalty.

A person who violates RCW 15.83.030 or 15.83.040 may be assessed a civil penalty by the director of not more than five thousand dollars for each offense. No civil penalty may be assessed unless the person charged has been given notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. In determining the amount of the penalty, the director shall consider the size of the business of the person charged, the penalty's affect [effect] on the person's ability to continue in business, and the gravity of the violation. If the director is unable to collect the civil penalty, the director shall refer the collection to the attorney general.

[ 1989 c 355 s 9.]